Washington statutes.
RCW 11.120.110

Disclosure of digital assets held in trust when trustee is original user.

Unless otherwise ordered by the court or provided in a trust, a custodian shall disclose to a trustee that is an original user of an account any digital asset of that account held in trust, including a catalogue of electronic communications of the trustee and the content of electronic communications.

[ 2016 c 140 s 11.]